Utah statutes.
72-4-117.   State highways -- SR-111 to SR-120.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-111.  From Route 48 east of Copperton northerly through Bacchus to
Route 201 northeast of Magna.
(2)  SR-112.  From a point east of Grantsville on Route 138 southeasterly to
Tooele on Route 36.
(3)  SR-113.  From Route 189 in Charleston northerly to Midway; then easterly
to Route 40 in Heber City.
(4)  SR-114.  From Route 89 in Provo westerly on Center Street to Geneva Road;
then northerly through Lakeview, Vineyard, and Geneva to Route 89 in Pleasant
Grove.
(5)  SR-115.  From Route 198 in Payson northerly to Benjamin; then easterly to
Route 156 in Spanish Fork.
(6)  SR-116.  From Route 132 in Moroni easterly to Route 89 in Mt. Pleasant.
(7)  SR-117.  From Wales easterly through Chester to Spring City; then
northeasterly to Route 89.
(8)  SR-118.  From Route 70 easterly through Joseph and Monroe; then northerly
to Route 120 in south Richfield. Beginning again with Route 120 at 300 North
in Richfield, northeasterly to Route 24 near Sigurd.
(9)  SR-119.  From Route 118 in Richfield easterly to Route 24 at Kings Meadow
Canyon.
(10)  SR-120.  From Route 70 easterly to Main Street in Richfield; then
northerly on Main Street to Route 70 north of Richfield.
